Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-863
Nebraska Student Loan Assistance Program; established.

There is hereby established the Nebraska Student Loan Assistance Program to be financed by the authority in the manner provided in the Nebraska Educational, Health, Cultural, and Social Services Finance Authority Act.

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 34;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2961;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 60;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1760;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 63;

Laws 2019, LB224, § 37.